Hawaii statutes.
§441-44 Trustee's account; enforcement by
attorney general. The trustee shall annually file with the director an
account which shall be made in such form as shall be prescribed by the
director. The director shall notify the attorney general of any failure on the
part of the trustee to comply with sections 441-37 to 441-44, or of the
instrument creating the fund, or trust, and the attorney general may take such
action as deemed appropriate. [L 1967, c 199, pt of §1; HRS §441-44; am L 1975,
c 21, §17; am L 1981, c 221, §21; am L 1985, c 101, §23]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next